Maryland, session 2026, HB1621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–321.3.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT
THAT HAS A DISCHARGE PERMIT TO PROCESS AN ANNUAL AVERAGE FLOW OF AT
LEAST 50,000,000 GALLONS OF EFFLUENT PER DAY.
(B) A WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT SHALL:
(1) (I) MAINTAIN A WEBSITE THAT IS ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC;
AND
(II) PUBLISH ON THE WEBSITE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
1. ON A MONTHLY BASIS, AFTER REPORTING TO THE
DEPARTMENT ON ANY TOTAL BACTERIA RESULTS REQUIRED UNDER THE
WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT’S DISCHARGE PERMIT, THE TOTAL BACTERIA
RESULTS REPORTED TO THE DEPARTMENT;
2. WITHIN 5 DAYS AFTER ANY BYPASS, OVERFLOW, OR
TREATMENT FAILURE, THE TOTAL VOLUME OF WASTEWATER DISCHARGED DURING
THE BYPASS, OVERFLOW, OR TREATMENT FAILURE;
3. WITHIN 5 DAYS AFTER ANY BYPASS, OVERFLOW, OR
TREATMENT FAILURE, AN EXPLANATION, IN PLAIN LANGUAGE, OF:
A. THE BYPASS, OVERFLOW, OR TREATMENT FAILURE;
AND
B. TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, ANY ACTION TAKEN
CONSISTENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 9–331.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
4. WITHIN 24 HOURS AFTER RECEIVING THE RESULTS
OF A TEST CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
RESULTS OF THE TEST; AND

HOUSE BILL 1621 3
(2) WITHIN 24 HOURS AFTER A BYPASS, OVERFLOW, OR TREATMENT
FAILURE THAT REQUIRES TESTING FOR BIOCHEMICAL OXYGEN DEMAND, TOTAL
SUSPENDED SOLIDS, BACTERIA, INCLUDING FECAL COLIFORM, ENTEROCOCCI, AND
E. COLI, NUTRIENTS, INCLUDING NITROGEN AND PHOSPHORUS, OR WHOLE
EFFLUENT TOXICITY, BEGIN THE REQUIRED TESTING.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PFAS” MEANS PER– AND POLYFLUOROALKYL
SUBSTANCES.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) MONITOR EFFLUENT DISCHARGED FROM WASTEWATER
TREATMENT PLANTS FOR HORMONES, PFAS, AND BACTERIA; AND
(2) EVALUATE WHETHER THE EFFLUENT DISCHARGED FROM
WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANTS CONTAINS HORMONES, PFAS, OR BACTERIA
BEYOND THE LIMITS OF THE WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT’S DISCHARGE
PERMIT.
(C) EACH WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT THAT HAS A DISCHARGE
PERMIT TO PROCESS AT LEAST 50,000,000 GALLONS OF EFFLUENT PER DAY SHALL:
(1) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2027, AND EACH 6 MONTHS
THEREAFTER, REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE WASTEWATER TREATMENT
PLANT’S STAFFING AND MANAGEMENT PLAN;
(2) MAINTAIN A WEBSITE THAT IS ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC;
(3) REPORT DAILY ON THE TOTAL BACTERIA DISCHARGED FROM THE
WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT ON THE WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT’S
WEBSITE;
(4) PROVIDE AN EXPLANATION, IN PLAIN LANGUAGE, ON THE
WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT’S WEBSITE:
(I) OF ANY BYPASS, OVERFLOW, OR TREATMENT FAILURE; AND
(II) TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE ESTIMATED DURATION,
AFFECTED WATERWAYS, AND POTENTIAL PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENTAL
IMPACTS OF THE BYPASS, OVERFLOW, OR TREATMENT FAILURE;

HOUSE BILL 1621
(5) WITHIN 24 HOURS OF A BYPASS, OVERFLOW, OR TREATMENT
FAILURE THAT REQUIRES TESTING FOR BIOCHEMICAL OXYGEN DEMAND, TOTAL
SUSPENDED SOLIDS, BACTERIA, INCLUDING FECAL COLIFORM, ENTEROCOCCI, AND
E. COLI, NUTRIENTS INCLUDING NITROGEN AND PHOSPHORUS, OR WHOLE
EFFLUENT TOXICITY, POST THE RESULTS OF THE TEST ON THE WASTEWATER
TREATMENT PLANT’S WEBSITE;
(6) WITHIN 14 DAYS OF ANY EVENT OR OCCURRENCE THAT RESULTS
IN THE WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT DISCHARGING EFFLUENT CONTAINING
HORMONES, PFAS, OR BACTERIA BEYOND THE LIMITS OF THE WASTEWATER
TREATMENT PLANT’S DISCHARGE PERMIT, POST ON THE WASTEWATER TREATMENT
PLANT’S WEBSITE:
(I) THE CAUSE OF THE EVENT OR OCCURRENCE;
(II) CORRECTIVE ACTIONS TAKEN; AND
(III) MEASURES IMPLEMENTED TO PREVENT REOCCURRENCE;
(7) KEEP ANY SEWAGE SLUDGE OR DRY SOLID HOLDING AREA
PHYSICALLY ENCLOSED; AND
(8) CAPTURE OR TREAT ANY VAPORS EMITTED FROM THE
WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT THAT MAY AFFECT THE PUBLIC.
(D) EACH WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT THAT HAS A DISCHARGE
PERMIT TO PROCESS LESS THAN 50,000,000 GALLONS OF EFFLUENT PER DAY
SHALL, ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE WASTEWATER TREATMENT
PLANT’S STAFFING AND MANAGEMENT PLAN.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH:
(I) BACTERIAL ACTION LEVELS FOR EFFLUENT FROM
WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANTS; AND
(II) A PROCESS FOR MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC TO SUBSCRIBE
TO RECEIVE REAL–TIME ALERTS WHEN A BACTERIAL ACTION LEVEL ESTABLISHED
UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS EXCEEDED.
(2) IF A WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT EXCEEDS THE BACTERIAL
ACTION LEVEL ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE

HOUSE BILL 1621 5
WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT SHALL IMMEDIATELY PROVIDE NOTICE ON THE
WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT’S WEBSITE.
(F) (1) A WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT THAT FAILS TO MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION OR IS FOUND TO HAVE DISCHARGED EFFLUENT
CONTAINING HORMONES, PFAS, OR BACTERIA BEYOND THE LIMITS OF THE
WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT’S DISCHARGE PERMIT FOR 2 CONSECUTIVE
MONTHS MAY NOT TAKE PART IN THE WATER QUALITY TRADING PROGRAM FOR
THE REMAINING PERIOD OF THAT WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT’S DISCHARGE
PERMIT.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY DENY, SUSPEND, OR REVOKE THE
APPROVAL OR CERTIFICATION OF CREDITS APPLICABLE FOR THE WATER QUALITY
TRADING PROGRAM IF THE DEPARTMENT FINDS THAT A WASTEWATER TREATMENT
PLANT HAS A HISTORY OF DISCHARGING EFFLUENT CONTAINING HORMONES,
PFAS, OR BACTERIA BEYOND THE LIMITS OF THE WASTEWATER TREATMENT
PLANT’S DISCHARGE PERMIT.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
9–331.1.
(a) (1) The owner or operator of any sanitary sewer system, combined sewer
system, or wastewater treatment plant shall report to the Department any sewer overflow
or treatment plant bypass that results in the direct or potential discharge of raw or diluted
sewage into the surface waters or groundwaters of the State.
(2) The report shall be made as soon as practicable but no later than 24
hours after the time that the operator or owner became aware of the event.
(3) Within 5 calendar days after notification of the event, the owner or
operator shall provide the Department with a written report regarding the incident that
includes any information required by the Department.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Department, in
cooperation with the Maryland Department of Health, the local health departments, and
local environmental health directors, shall develop AUTOMATED procedures for requiring
the owner or operator of any sanitary sewer system, combined sewer system, or wastewater
treatment plant to provide public notification of a sewer overflow or treatment plant
bypass.
(2) The procedures developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall:
(i) Require that the notification be posted:

HOUSE BILL 1621
1. In Spanish and English at the location of the sewer
overflow or treatment plant bypass;
2. On the website of the Department, the Maryland
Department of Health, and the appropriate local health department; and
3. On any social media website on which the appropriate
local health department regularly posts information; and
(ii) Require IMMEDIATE notification [within a reasonable time] to:
1. Appropriate downstream jurisdictions;
2. Appropriate county governments;
3. State parks impacted by the sewer overflow or treatment
plant bypass;
4. The Department of Natural Resources; and
5. Any other local, State, or federal land manager impacted
by the sewer overflow or treatment plant bypass.
(c) (1) The Maryland Department of Health and the local health departments
shall make all decisions and determinations as to public health issues resulting from sewer
overflows or treatment bypasses.
(2) The owner or operator of any sanitary sewer system, combined sewer
system, or wastewater treatment plant is not responsible for making public health
determinations regarding sewer overflow or treatment plant bypasses.
(d) The Department shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of
this section.
9–332.
(a) A person may not introduce any pollutant, either directly or indirectly, into a
publicly owned treatment works, or into any conveyance leading to a publicly owned
treatment works, in violation of any applicable pretreatment requirements including
federal pretreatment standards, State requirements, local ordinances, or any pretreatment
agreement.
(b) The Secretary may delegate to owners of publicly owned treatment works the
authority to apply and enforce State pretreatment requirements against industrial users.

HOUSE BILL 1621 7
(c) The Secretary may determine which publicly owned treatment works are or
may be adversely impacted by industrial users and may require the owners of those publicly
owned treatment works to develop and maintain programs which meet State pretreatment
requirements.
(d) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A PUBLICLY AVAILABLE AND
SEARCHABLE DATABASE THAT INCLUDES:
(1) A LIST OF ALL THE INDUSTRIAL USERS THAT HOLD A
PRETREATMENT PERMIT;
(2) WHICH POLLUTANTS ARE BEING DISCHARGED BY EACH
PRETREATMENT PERMIT HOLDER;
(3) WHETHER EACH PRETREATMENT PERMIT HOLDER IS COMPLYING
WITH THE PRETREATMENT PERMIT HOLDER’S PERMIT; AND
(4) WHICH ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS HAVE BEEN TAKEN AGAINST A
PRETREATMENT PERMIT HOLDER THAT HAS VIOLATED THE PRETREATMENT
PERMIT HOLDER’S PERMIT.
(E) This section shall not be construed to limit any other provision of law imposing
any restriction or prohibition relating to the discharge or disposal of pollutants or controlled
hazardous wastes.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.